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DIASF-01

DTC C 1549 /49 Vehicle Skid Control System Commu-
nication Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The VGRS ECU communicates with the skid control ECU. However, if any problems in this communication
occur, the VGRS ECU turns on the warning light, records the DTC and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

- . * Wire harness and connector
C1549/49 The system detects a communication malfunction from the VGRSECU
skid control ECU for 3 seconds. )
« Skid control ECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkthe signal waveform.

VGRS ECU

/

F17859

C 1V/DIV, 1 ms/DIV

4 GND

F1797|

|

Proceed to step
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PREPARATION:

Startthe engine.

CHECK:

(@) Using an oscilloscope, check the waveform between
VSC+ and GND of the VGRS ECU.

OK:
High and Low

(b) Usingan oscilloscope, check the waveform between
VSC- and GND ofthe VGRS ECU.

OK:
High and Low

0K> Replace VGRS ECU.
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2 Check for an open or short circuit in the harness and connector between termi-
nalsVSC+andVSC - ofthe VGRS ECU,andbetweenterminalsVSC+andVSC -
of the skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

PREPARATION:
VGRS ECU connector (@ Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(V17) VSC+ (b) Disconnectthe VGRS ECU connector (V17) and the skid
control ECU connector (A55).
CHECK:
2|34y s|e| e |oqo Check continuity betweenterminal VSC+andVSC - ofthe
12]13[14]15]16/17]18 [19]20]21 (22 VGRS ECU and skid control ECU.
OK:
, VSC- Continuity
Skid Control ECU connector
(A55)
| e—
1
1{2]3]4 |5 67
8 |9 [1o]11 J12]13]14]15
16] 17 18[19]20]21]22
/
/
VSC+ VSC-
F17863
NG Repair or replace harness and connector.
OK \
3Checkforashorttogroundinthe VSC+andVSC - circuit.

OK:

No short to ground.

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

@

Replace skid control ECU.
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